Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.510

Night schools, summer schools, meetings, use of facilities for.

Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(1) Authorize school facilities to be used for night schools and establish and maintain the same whenever deemed advisable;

(2) Authorize school facilities to be used for summer schools or for meetings, whether public, literary, scientific, religious, political, mechanical, agricultural or whatever, upon approval of the board under such rules or regulations as the board of directors may adopt, which rules or regulations may require a reasonable rental for the use of such facilities.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.105. Prior: 1969 c 53 s 1, part; 1967 ex.s. c 29 s 1, part; 1967 c 12 s 1, part; 1965 ex.s. c 49 s 1, part; 1963 c 104 s 1, part; 1963 c 5 s 1, part; 1961 c 305 s 1, part; 1961 c 237 s 1, part; 1961 c 66 s 1, part; 1955 c 68 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.105, 28.58.100 (10) and (12).]